Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
244D

LIQUOR TAX
LAW

Section

244D-1 Definitions

244D-2 Permit

244D-3 Cooperation between department and liquor
commission

244D-4 Tax; limitations

244D-4.3 Exemption for sales of liquor shipped out
of the State

244D-4.5, 5 Repealed

244D-6 Return, form, contents

244D-7 Payment of tax; penalties

244D-8 Determination of tax, additional
assessments, credit,

and refunds

244D-9 Records to be kept

244D-10 Inspection

244D-11 Tax in addition to other taxes

244D-12 Appeals

244D-13 Other provisions applicable

244D-14 Investigations; contempts; fees

244D-15 Administration by director; rules and
regulations

244D-16 Penalties

244D-17 Disposition of revenues

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next